test/src/morphology/sms-tests_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup




Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - mõõnnâd: # Verb 'to go' - full paradigm
     mõõnnâd+V+Inf: mõõnnâd
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mõõnam
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: mõõnak
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mâânn
# Check the source on the second form _mõõˊnnâp_ 2012-11-22
# Is there a reason the palatal mark should be there?
#     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [mõõnnâp, mõõˊnnâp]
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: mõõnnâp
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: mõõnnveˊted
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mâˊnne
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+4: mõõnât
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: mõõn
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: mõˊnnem
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: mõˊnniǩ
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: mõõni
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: mõõnim
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: mõõnid
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mõˊnne
     mõõnnâd+V+Ind+Prt+4: mõˊnneš
     mõõnnâd+V+PrfPrc: mõõnnâm

  Verb - vueˊlǧǧed: # Verb 'to set off' - full paradigm
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Inf: vueˊlǧǧed
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuâlǥam
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuâlǥak
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuâlgg
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vueˊlǧǧep
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vueˊlǧǧveˊted
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [vuâˊlǧǧe, vueˊlǧǧe, vuâˊlǧǧe, vuäˊlǧǧe, vuäˊlǧǧa]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+4: vueˊljet
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vueˊlj
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [vuõˊlǧǧem, vuiˊlǧǧem]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [vuõˊlǧǧiǩ, vuiˊlǧǧiǩ]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [vuõˊlji, vueˊlji]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [vuõˊljim, vuõˊljin vueˊljim, vueˊljin]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [vuõˊljid, vueˊljid]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vuõˊlǧǧe, vuiˊlǧǧe, vueˊlǧǧe]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+4: vuõˊlǧǧeš
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuâlggam
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+Sg1: [vuõˊljžem, vueˊljžem]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+Sg2: [vuõˊljžiǩ, vueˊljžiǩ]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+Sg3: [vuõˊljež, vueˊljež]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+Pl1: [vuõˊljžep,vueˊljžep, vuõˊljžim, vueˊljžim]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+Pl2: [vuõˊljžid, vueˊljžid] 
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+Pl3: [vuõˊljže, vueˊljže]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+4: [vuõˊljžet, vueˊljžet]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pot+ConNeg: vuõˊljže
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+Sg1: vuâlǥčem
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+Sg2: vuâlǥčiǩ
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+Sg3: vuâlǥči
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+Pl1: [vuâlǥčim, vuâlǥčep]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+Pl2: vuâlǥčid
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+Pl3: vuâlǥče
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+4: vuâlǥčeš
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Cond+ConNeg: vuâlǥče
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Imp+Sg2: vueˊlj
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Imp+Sg3: vuâlǥas
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Imp+Pl1: vueˊlǧǧep
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Imp+Pl2: vueˊlǧǧed
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Imp+Pl3: vuâlǥǥaz
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Imp+ConNeg: vuõlggu
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+ActEss: vueˊlǧǧmen
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Action: vueˊlǧǧem
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+PrsPrc: [vuõˊlǧǧi, vueˊlǧǧi]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+PrfPrc: vuâlggam
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: vuõlggum
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+VAbess: [vueˊljkani, vueˊljǩeännai]
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+GerTemp: vueˊljeen
     vueˊlǧǧed+V+GerInstr: vueˊljeeˊl


  Verb - viikkâd: # Verb 'to run' - full paradigm
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: viiǥǥam
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: viiǥǥak
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: veekk
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: viikkâp
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: viikkveˊted
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: veˊǩǩe 
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+4: viiǥǥât
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: viˊǩǩem 
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: viˊǩǩiǩ 
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: viiǥǥi
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [viiǥǥim, viiǥǥin]
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: viiǥǥid
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: viˊǩǩe
     viikkâd+V+Ind+Prt+4: viˊǩǩeš
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Sg1: viiǥǥžem
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Sg2: viiǥǥžiǩ
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Sg3: viiǥǥâž
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Pl1: [viiǥǥžep, viiǥǥžim, viiǥǥžin]
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Pl2: viiǥǥžid 
     viikkâd+V+Pot+Pl3: viiǥǥže
     viikkâd+V+Pot+4: viiǥǥžet
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Sg1: viiǥǥčem
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Sg2: viiǥǥčiǩ
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Sg3: viiǥǥči
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Pl1: [viiǥǥčim, viiǥǥčin, viiǥǥčep]
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Pl2: viiǥǥčid
     viikkâd+V+Cond+Pl3: viiǥǥče
     viikkâd+V+Cond+4: viiǥǥčeš
     viikkâd+V+Imp+Sg2: viiǥǥ
     viikkâd+V+Imp+Sg3: veeǥǥas
     viikkâd+V+Imp+Pl1: viikkâp
     viikkâd+V+Imp+Pl2: viikkâd
     viikkâd+V+Imp+Pl3: vekkaz
     viikkâd+V+ActEss: viikkmen
     viikkâd+V+Action: viikkâm
     viikkâd+V+PrsPrc: viikki
     viikkâd+V+PrfPrc: viikkâm
     viikkâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc: vikkum
     viikkâd+V+VAbess: [viiǥǥkâni, viiǥǥkani, viiǥǥǩeânai]
     viikkâd+V+GerTemp: viiǥǥeen
     viikkâd+V+GerInstr: viiǥǥeeˊl
     viikkâd+V+Imp+ConNeg: vikku
     
  Verb - poorrâd: # Verb 'to eat' - full paradigm
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pooram
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: poorak
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: påårr
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: poorrâp
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: poorrveˊted
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: påˊrre
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prs+4: poorât
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: poˊrrem
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: poˊrriǩ
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: poori
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [poorim, poorin]
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: poorid
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: poˊrre
     poorrâd+V+Ind+Prt+4: poˊrreš
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg1: pooržem
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg2: pooržiǩ
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Sg3: poorâž
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Pl1: [pooržep, pooržim]
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Pl2: pooržid
     poorrâd+V+Pot+Pl3: poorže
     poorrâd+V+Pot+4: pooržet
     poorrâd+V+Pot+ConNeg: poorže
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg1: poorčem
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg2: poorčiǩ
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Sg3: poorči
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Pl1: [poorčim, poorčep]
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Pl2: poorčid
     poorrâd+V+Cond+Pl3: poorče
     poorrâd+V+Cond+4: poorčeš
     poorrâd+V+Cond+ConNeg: poorče
     poorrâd+V+Imp+Sg2: poor
     poorrâd+V+Imp+Sg3: pååras
     poorrâd+V+Imp+Pl1: poorrâp
     poorrâd+V+Imp+Pl2: poorrâd
     poorrâd+V+Imp+Pl3: pårraz
     poorrâd+V+Imp+ConNeg: porru
     poorrâd+V+ActEss: poorrmen
     poorrâd+V+Action: poorrâm
     poorrâd+V+PrsPrc: poorri
     poorrâd+V+PrfPrc: poorrâm
     poorrâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc: porrum
     poorrâd+V+VAbess: poorkani
     poorrâd+V+GerTemp: pooreen
     poorrâd+V+GerInstr: pooreeˊl
   
  Verb - läullad: # Verb 'to sing' - full paradigm
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lääulam
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lääulak
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: läull
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: läullap
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: läullveˊted
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: läulla
     läullad+V+Ind+Prs+4: lääulat
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: laullum
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: laulluk
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lääulai
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [lääulaim, lääulain]
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: lääulaid
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: laullu
     läullad+V+Ind+Prt+4: laulluš
     läullad+V+Pot+Sg1: lääulžem
     läullad+V+Pot+Sg2: lääulžiǩ
     läullad+V+Pot+Sg3: lääulež
     läullad+V+Pot+Pl1: [lääulžep, lääulžim]
     läullad+V+Pot+Pl2: lääulžid 
     läullad+V+Pot+Pl3: lääulže
     läullad+V+Pot+4: lääulžet
     läullad+V+Pot+ConNeg: lääulže
     läullad+V+Cond+Sg1: lääulčem
     läullad+V+Cond+Sg2: lääulčiǩ
     läullad+V+Cond+Sg3: lääulči
     läullad+V+Cond+Pl1: [lääulčim, lääulčep]
     läullad+V+Cond+Pl2: lääulčid
     läullad+V+Cond+Pl3: lääulče
     läullad+V+Cond+4: lääulčeš
     läullad+V+Cond+ConNeg: lääulče
     läullad+V+Imp+Sg2: lääul
     läullad+V+Imp+Sg3: lääulas
     läullad+V+Imp+Pl1: läullap
     läullad+V+Imp+Pl2: läullad
     läullad+V+Imp+Pl3: läullaz
     läullad+V+Imp+ConNeg: laullu
     läullad+V+ActEss: läullmen
     läullad+V+Action: läullam
     läullad+V+PrsPrc: läullai
     läullad+V+PrfPrc: läullam
     läullad+V+Pass+PrfPrc: laullum
     läullad+V+VAbess: lääulkani
     läullad+V+GerTemp: lääuleen
     läullad+V+GerInstr: lääuleeˊl
           
  Verb - juˊrdded: # Verb 'to think, to consider' - full paradigm
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: joordam
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: joordak
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jordd
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: juˊrddep
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: juˊrddveˊted
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: joˊrdde
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prs+4: juuˊrdet
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: juˊrddem
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: juˊrddiǩ
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: juuˊrdi
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [juuˊrdim, juuˊrdin]
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: juuˊrdid
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: juˊrdde
     juˊrdded+V+Ind+Prt+4: juˊrddeš 
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+Sg1: juuˊrdžem
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+Sg2: juuˊrdžiǩ
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+Sg3: juuˊrdež
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+Pl1: [juuˊrdžep, juuˊrdžim]
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+Pl2: juuˊrdžid
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+Pl3: juuˊrdže
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+4: juuˊrdžet
     juˊrdded+V+Pot+ConNeg: juuˊrdže
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+Sg1: joordčem
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+Sg2: joordčiǩ
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+Sg3: joordči
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+Pl1: [joordčim, juurdčep]
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+Pl2: joordčid
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+Pl3: joordče
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+4: joordčeš
     juˊrdded+V+Cond+ConNeg: joordče
     juˊrdded+V+Imp+Sg2: juuˊrd
     juˊrdded+V+Imp+Sg3: joordas
     juˊrdded+V+Imp+Pl1: juˊrddep
     juˊrdded+V+Imp+Pl2: juˊrdded
     juˊrdded+V+Imp+Pl3: jorddaz
     juˊrdded+V+Imp+ConNeg: jurddu
     juˊrdded+V+Action: juˊrddem
     juˊrdded+V+ActEss: juˊrddmen
     juˊrdded+V+PrsPrc: juˊrddi
     juˊrdded+V+PrfPrc: jorddam
     juˊrdded+V+Pass+PrfPrc: jurddum
     juˊrdded+V+VAbess: [juuˊrdkâni, juuˊrdkani, juuˊrdǩeânai]
     juˊrdded+V+GerTemp: juuˊrdeen
     juˊrdded+V+GerInstr: juuˊrdeeˊl
     

  Verb - ääˊveed: # Verb 'to open' - full paradigm
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ääˊvääm
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: ääˊvääk
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ääˊvad
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ääˊveep
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ääˊvveˊted
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: ääˊvee 
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prs+4: ääˊveet
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: ääˊveem
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: ääˊviiǩ
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: ääˊvii
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [ääˊviim, ääˊviin]
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: ääˊviid
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: ääˊvee
     ääˊveed+V+Ind+Prt+4: ääˊveeš
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+Sg1: ääˊveˊžem
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+Sg2: ääˊveˊžiǩ
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+Sg3: ääˊveež
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+Pl1: [ääˊveˊžep, ääˊveˊžim]
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+Pl2: ääˊveˊžid 
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+Pl3: ääˊveˊže
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+4: ääˊveˊžet
     ääˊveed+V+Pot+ConNeg: ääˊveˊže
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+Sg1: ääˊveˊčem
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+Sg2: ääˊveˊčiǩ
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+Sg3: ääˊveˊči
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+Pl1: [ääˊveˊčim, ääˊveˊčep]
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+Pl2: ääˊveˊčid
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+Pl3: ääˊveˊče
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+4: ääˊveˊčeš
     ääˊveed+V+Cond+ConNeg: ääˊveˊče
     ääˊveed+V+Imp+Sg2: ääˊved
     ääˊveed+V+Imp+Sg3: ääˊvââǥǥas
     ääˊveed+V+Imp+Pl1: ääˊvâkap
     ääˊveed+V+Imp+Pl2: ääˊveˊǩed
     ääˊveed+V+Imp+Pl3: ääˊvâkaz
     ääˊveed+V+Imp+ConNeg: ääˊvukku
     ääˊveed+V+ActEss: ääˊveˊmen
     ääˊveed+V+Action: ääˊveem
     ääˊveed+V+PrsPrc: ääˊveei
     ääˊveed+V+PrfPrc: ääˊvääm
     ääˊveed+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [ääˊvummu, ääˊvuum]
     ääˊveed+V+VAbess: ääˊveǩâni
     ääˊveed+V+GerTemp: ääˊveen
     ääˊveed+V+GerInstr: ääˊveeˊl
